California, session 20252026, AB1135.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 234.55 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 234.5, to read:234.55. (a) By July 1, 2026, the Superintendent shall develop and post on the department’s internet website guidance and a list of statewide resources for the purpose of preventing teen dating violence.(b) By January 1, 2027, each county office of education, school district, and charter school maintaining any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall post the guidance and list of statewide resources developed pursuant to subdivision (a) on their respective internet website.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 234 of the Education Code is amended to read:234.(a)This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Safe Place to Learn Act.(b)It is the policy of the State of California to ensure that all local educational agencies continue to work to reduce discrimination, harassment, violence, intimidation, and bullying. It is further the policy of the state to improve pupil safety at schools and improve the connections between pupils and supportive adults, schools, and communities.